Hawaii statutes.
§432:1-603 Reimbursement for psychological
services. Notwithstanding any provision of any individual or group
hospital or medical service plan contract, whenever the contract provides
reimbursement or payment for any service which is within the lawful scope of
practice of a psychologist licensed in this State, the person entitled to
benefits or performing the service shall be entitled to reimbursement or
payment whether the service is performed by a licensed physician or licensed
psychologist. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next